Oklahoma, session 2025, SB120.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 10-9.5, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 372, O.S.L. 2024 (2 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 10-9.5), is amended to read as follows:


Section 10-9.5. A. The State Board of Agriculture shall


provide the necessary forms and applications for any person desiring


or required to register a poultry feeding operation or expanding


operation.


B. The application to register to operate a new or previously


unregistered poultry feeding operation or expanding operation shall


contain, at a minimum, the following information:

Req. No. 184 Page 1


1. Name and address of the owner and operator of the facility;


2. Name and address of the poultry feeding operation;


3. Number and type of poultry housed or confined;


4. Name and address of the integrator whose poultry will be


raised by the poultry feeding operation;


5. A diagram or map and legal description showing geographical


location of the facility on which the perimeters of the facility are


designated, location of waters of the state, including, but not


limited to, drainage from the facility, poultry waste storage


facilities, and land-application sites owned or leased by the


applicant or which the applicant has contracted with for the


application of poultry waste;


6. A copy of the Nutrient Management Plan, or proof of


application for such plan, Best Management Practices or any other


plans authorized by the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food,


and Forestry;


7. A statement of ownership.


a. If the applicant is a corporation, the name and


address of the corporation and the name and address of


each officer and registered agent of the corporation


shall be included in the application.


b. If the applicant is a partnership or other legal


entity, the name and address of each partner and



Req. No. 184 Page 2


stockholder with an ownership interest of ten percent


(10%) or more shall be included in the statement.


c. The information contained in the statement of


ownership shall be public information and shall be


available upon request from the Board;


8. In order to be considered a resident of this state for


purposes of registration, all registered owners and operators of the


facility shall provide proof of state residency for at least two (2)


years immediately preceding the date of application. Sufficient


documentation of proof of residency shall include a combination of


the following:


a. an unexpired state-issued driver license,


b. an unexpired state-issued identification card,


c. a utility bill preceding the date of application,


excluding cellular telephone and Internet bills,


d. a residential property deed to property in this state,


and


e. a rental agreement preceding the date of application


for residential property located in this state.


The name on the application shall be reflected on all


documentation requested in this paragraph;


9. The name and address of the person having day-to-day control


of the operation, if such person is not the applicant and is acting


as agent for the applicant;

Req. No. 184 Page 3


9. 10. An environmental history from the past three (3) years


of any poultry feeding operation established and operated by the


applicant or any other operation with common ownership in this state


or any other state;


10. 11. Environmental awards or citations received or pollution


prevention or voluntary remediation efforts undertaken by the


applicant; and


11. 12. Any other information or records required by the


Department for purposes of implementing the Oklahoma Registered


Poultry Feeding Operations Act or rules promulgated pursuant


thereto.


C. In addition to other penalties as may be imposed by law, any


person who knowingly makes any false statement, representation, or


certification in, omits material data from, or tampers with any


application for registration shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a


misdemeanor and may be subject to a fine not more than Ten Thousand


Dollars ($10,000.00) for each such violation.


D. The owner of a poultry feeding operation shall be


responsible for sending written notification to the Department upon


changing integrators.


E. For a transfer of registration to a new owner, the new owner


shall register the operation pursuant to the rules of the


Department.



Req. No. 184 Page 4


F. 1. All operators of poultry feeding operations and poultry


waste applicators shall attend educational courses on poultry waste


handling. All such operators and applicators shall attend


educational training on poultry waste management as provided by


Oklahoma State University through the Cooperative Extension Service.


All current and new operators and applicators shall receive the


initial nine (9) hours of training in the first year and two (2)


hours of continuing education every year until the operator or


applicator has received a total of nineteen (19) hours of training.


Any operator or applicator may attend more hours than is required;


however, those hours shall not be carried forward. Upon receiving


the nineteen (19) required hours, the operator or applicator shall


be required to receive two (2) hours of continuing education every


three (3) years. The Cooperative Extension Service shall develop


the educational training course to aid in certification. Curricula


for the training course will include the Cooperative Extension


Service waste management facts series and record books or their


current equivalent. Courses for poultry waste management shall


include the following topics:


a. environmental process relevant to protecting water


quality in poultry production,


b. basic handling systems to manage poultry waste from


all types of poultry operations,



Req. No. 184 Page 5


c. nutrient management, including sampling procedures,


application rate determination, equipment calibration,


and record-keeping systems,


d. relevant laws and rules applicable to poultry waste


management in this state, and


e. any other related subject as determined by Oklahoma


State University in consultation with the Department.


2. At the completion of each course, the operator or applicator


shall receive a certification verifying completion. The


certificates shall be kept on site for five (5) years.


3. Failure to obtain the initial nine-hour training and any


continuing education as provided in this subsection shall be deemed


a violation of the Oklahoma Registered Poultry Feeding Operations


Act for operators and the Oklahoma Poultry Waste Applicators


Certification Act for applicators.


4. All operators or applicators shall meet the educational


requirements of this section no later than December 31 of each year.


5. All operators and applicators are solely responsible for


obtaining and maintaining all educational requirements established


pursuant to the provisions of this subsection.


G. No integrator shall enter into any contract with an operator


of a poultry feeding operation who is not in compliance with the


education requirements of subsection F of this section.



Req. No. 184 Page 6


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 20-45, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 20-45. A. The State Board of Agriculture shall cause


to be prepared and available, for any person desiring or required to


apply for a license to operate a new or previously unlicensed animal


feeding operation, the necessary forms and applications.


B. The application for a license to operate a new or previously


unlicensed animal feeding operation shall contain, as a minimum, the


following information:


1. Name and address of the owner and operator of the facility;


2. Name and address of the animal feeding operation;


3. Capacity in animal units, and number and type of animals


housed or confined;


4. A diagram or map and legal description showing geographical


location of the facility on which the perimeters of the facility are


designated, location of waters of the state, including, but not


limited to, drainage from the facility, animal waste storage


facilities and land application sites owned or leased by the


applicant;


5. A copy of the Pollution Prevention Plan containing an Animal


Waste Management Plan, Best Management Practices, or such other plan


authorized by the Oklahoma Concentrated Animal Feeding Operations


Act and approved by the Department;



Req. No. 184 Page 7


6. A copy of the written waiver by an adjacent property owner


to the facility releasing specified setback requirements as provided


by Section 44 of the Oklahoma Concentrated Animal Feeding Operations


Act; and


7. In order to be considered a resident of this state for


purposes of licensure, all licensed owners and operators of the


facility shall provide proof of state residency for at least two (2)


years immediately preceding the date of application. Sufficient


documentation of proof of residency shall include a combination of


the following:


a. an unexpired state-issued driver license,


b. an unexpired state-issued identification card,


c. a utility bill preceding the date of application,


excluding cellular telephone and Internet bills,


d. a residential property deed to property in this state,


and


e. a rental agreement preceding the date of application


for residential property located in this state.


The name on the application shall be reflected on all


documentation requested in this paragraph; and


8. Any other information deemed necessary by the Oklahoma


Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry to administer the


provisions of the Oklahoma Concentrated Animal Feeding Operations


Act and rules promulgated pursuant thereto.

Req. No. 184 Page 8


C. 1. An application for renewal of a license to operate an


animal feeding operation shall be considered to be properly filed


when the Department has received a completed renewal application and


payment of fees from the applicant.


2. If the application for renewal is denied, written


notification of the denial and an opportunity for an administrative


hearing on the denial shall be given to the applicant by the


Department. The notification shall set forth the reasons for the


denial, steps necessary to meet the requirements for issuance of the


renewal license and the opportunity for the applicant to request an


administrative hearing.


D. For transfer of a license to a new owner or operator, the


following conditions shall be met:


1. The new owner or operator shall submit to the Department a


transfer application, attaching any change of conditions resulting


from the transfer of ownership or operation;


2. After receipt of the information required, the Department


shall review the information, and within sixty (60) days, issue


approval or denial of the transfer. Transfer of a license shall be


denied only if:


a. the new owner or operator cannot comply with the


requirements of transfer,





Req. No. 184 Page 9


b. the Department finds a material or substantial change


in conditions since the issuance of the original


license to operate the animal feeding operation,


c. failure of the new owner or operator to meet any other


conditions or requirements for compliance established


by the Department pursuant to the Oklahoma


Concentrated Animal Feeding Operations Act and rules


promulgated pursuant thereto, or


d. the new owner or operator has failed to meet the


requirements of Section 48 of the Oklahoma


Concentrated Animal Feeding Operations Act 20-61 of


this title; and


3. If a transfer is denied, written notification of the denial


and an opportunity for an administrative hearing on the denial shall


be given to the applicant for a transfer license by the Department.


The notification shall set forth the reasons for the denial, steps


necessary to meet the requirements for a transfer license, and the


opportunity for the applicant to request an administrative hearing;


and


4. Proof of residency provisions pursuant to paragraph 7 of


subsection B of this section.


E. Any suspension or revocation or nonrenewal of a license


issued pursuant to the Oklahoma Concentrated Animal Feeding



Req. No. 184 Page 10


Operations Act by the Board shall be made in accordance with Section


of this act 20-61 of this title.


F. In addition to other information required for issuance of a


new or transfer license, an application for a new or transfer


license for a concentrated animal feeding operation shall contain


the following information:


1. a. A statement of ownership.


(1) If the applicant is a firm or partnership, the


name and address of each member thereof shall be


included in the application.


(2) If the applicant is a corporation, the name and


address of the corporation and the name and


address of each officer and registered agent of


the corporation shall be included in the


application.


(3) If the applicant is a partnership or other legal


entity, the name and address of each partner and


stockholder with an ownership interest of ten


percent (10%) or more shall be included in the


statement.


b. The information contained in the statement of


ownership shall be public information and shall be


available upon request from the Board;



Req. No. 184 Page 11


2. The name and address of the management, if the management is


not the applicant and is acting as agent for the applicant;


3. a. An environmental history from the past three (3) years


of any concentrated animal or swine feeding operation


established and operated by the applicant or any other


operation with common ownership in this state or any


other state. The environmental history shall include


but not be limited to all citations, administrative


orders or penalties, civil injunctions or other civil


actions, criminal actions, past, current and ongoing,


taken by any person, agency or court relating to


noncompliance with any environmental law, rule, agency


order, or court action relating to the operation of an


animal or swine feeding operation.


b. A copy of all records relating to the environmental


history required by this paragraph shall accompany the


application.


c. Noncompliance with a final agency order or final order


or judgment of a court of record which has been set


aside by a court on appeal of the final order or


judgment shall not be considered a final order or


judgment for the purposes of this subsection;





Req. No. 184 Page 12


4. Environmental awards or citations received or pollution


prevention or voluntary remediation efforts undertaken by the


applicant; and


5. Any other information or records required by the Department


for purposes of implementing the Oklahoma Concentrated Animal


Feeding Operations Act or rules promulgated pursuant thereto.


G. 1. In addition to other penalties as may be imposed by law,


any person who knowingly makes any false statement, representation,


or certification in, omits material data from, or tampers with any


application for a license, or notice relating to the determination


of affected property owners, shall, upon conviction thereof, be


guilty of a misdemeanor and may be subject to a fine of not more


than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for each such violation. In


addition, the Department shall deny licensure to the applicant or


may require submission of a new application.


2. The responsibility for ensuring that all affected property


owners are notified pursuant to the provisions of this section shall


be upon the applicant.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-184 MR 12/27/2024 10:55:22 AM







Req. No. 184 Page 13